Colorado statutes. TITLE 42 VEHICLES AND TRAFFIC
PART 1
HAZARDOUS MATERIALS - GENERAL PROVISIONS

42-20-101. Short title.

Parts 1, 2, and 3 of this article shall be known and may be cited as the "Hazardous Materials Transportation Act of 1987".

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2516, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 43-6-101 as it existed prior to 1994.

42-20-102. Legislative declaration.

The general assembly finds that the permitting and routing of motor vehicles transporting hazardous materials is a matter of statewide concern and is affected with a public interest and that the provisions of parts 1, 2, and 3 of this article are enacted in the exercise of the police powers of this state for the purpose of protecting the health, peace, safety, and welfare of the people of this state.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2516, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 43-6-102 as it existed prior to 1994.

42-20-103. Definitions.

As used in this article, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Chief" means the chief of the Colorado state patrol.

"Enforcement official" means, and is limited to, a peace officer who is an officer of the Colorado state patrol as described in sections 16-2.5-101 and 16-2.5-114, C.R.S., a port of entry officer, as defined in section 42-8-102 (3), a peace officer who is an investigating official of the transportation section of the public utilities commission as described in sections 16-2.5-101 and 16-2.5-143, C.R.S., or any other peace officer as described in section 16-2.5-101, C.R.S.

"Hazardous materials" means those materials listed in tables 1 and 2 of 49 CFR 172.504, excluding highway route controlled quantities of radioactive materials as defined in 49 CFR 173.403 (l), excluding ores, the products from mining, milling, smelting, and similar processing of ores, and the wastes and tailing therefrom, and excluding special fireworks as defined in 49 CFR 173.88 (d) when the aggregate amount of flash powder does not exceed fifty pounds.

"Motor vehicle" means any device which is capable of moving from place to place upon public roads. The term includes, but is not limited to, any motorized vehicle or any such vehicle with a trailer or semitrailer attached thereto.

"Patrol" means the Colorado state patrol within the department of public safety.

"Person" means an individual, a corporation, a government or governmental subdivision or agency, a partnership, an association, or any other legal entity; except that separate divisions of the same corporation may, at their request, be treated as separate persons for the purposes of part 2 of this article.

"Public road" means every way publicly maintained and opened to the use of the public for the purposes of vehicular travel, including, but not limited to, streets, bridges, toll roads, tunnels, and state and federal highways.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2516, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 2003:

(2) amended, p. 1626, § 52, effective August 6.

L. 2012:

(2) amended, (HB 12-1019), ch. 135, p. 472, § 21, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 43-6-103 as it existed prior to 1994.

42-20-104. General powers and duties of chief - department of public safety - cooperation from other state agencies.

In addition to any other powers and duties granted to him or her in parts 1, 2, and 3 of this article, the chief shall promulgate such rules and regulations and conduct such hearings as may be necessary for the administration of this article.

In addition to any other powers and duties granted to him or her in parts 1, 2, and 3 of this article and except as otherwise provided in parts 1, 2, and 3 of this article, the chief shall have the general authority and duty to carry out the provisions of parts 1, 2, and 3 of this article and shall promulgate such rules and regulations, subject to the provisions of article 4 of title 24, C.R.S., as may be necessary to clarify the enforcement provisions of parts 1, 2, and 3 of this article.

Upon request, other agencies of state government, including but not limited to the department of public health and environment and the department of transportation, shall provide advice and assistance to the department of public safety relating to the program established by parts 1, 2, and 3 of this article.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2517, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 43-6-104 as it existed prior to 1994.

42-20-105. Enforcement.

The provisions of parts 1, 2, and 3 of this article relating to the transportation of hazardous materials by motor vehicle may only be enforced by an enforcement official.

Any enforcement official shall have the authority to issue penalty assessments for the misdemeanor traffic offenses specified in sections 42-20-204 (1) and 42-20-305 (2). At any time that a person is cited for a violation of any of the offenses specified, the person in charge of or operating the motor vehicle involved shall be given a notice in the form of a penalty assessment notice. Such notice shall be tendered by the enforcement official and shall contain the name and address of such person, the license number of the motor vehicle involved, if any, the number of such person's driver's license, the nature of the violation, the amount of the penalty prescribed for such violation, the date of the notice, a place for such person to execute a signed acknowledgment of receipt of the penalty assessment notice, a place for such person to execute a signed acknowledgment of guilt for the cited violation, and such other information as may be required by law to constitute such notice as a summons and complaint to appear in court should the prescribed penalty not be paid within twenty days. Every cited person shall execute the signed acknowledgment of receipt of the penalty assessment notice. The acknowledgment of guilt shall be executed at the time the cited person pays the prescribed penalty. The person cited shall pay the specified penalty at the office of the department of revenue, either in person or by postmarking such payment within twenty days after the citation. The department of revenue shall accept late payment of any penalty assessment up to twenty days after such payment becomes due. If the person cited does not pay the prescribed penalty within twenty days of the notice, the penalty assessment notice shall constitute a summons and complaint to appear in the county court of the county in which the penalty assessment was issued at a time and place specified by the notice, unless payment for such penalty assessment has been accepted by the department of revenue as evidenced by receipt.

All enforcement officials may, at their discretion and in lieu of issuing the penalty assessments pursuant to subsection (2) of this section, issue warning citations to persons who violate the provisions of part 1, 2, or 3 of this article.

Enforcement of any law relating to the fixed-site storage or use of hazardous materials shall not be affected by the provisions of part 1, 2, or 3 of this article.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2518, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 2000:

(2) amended, p. 1651, § 47, effective June 1.

L. 2003:

(1) amended, p. 664, § 2, effective August 6.

L. 2006:

(1) amended, p. 1064, § 2, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 43-6-105 as it existed prior to 1994.

42-20-106. Regulatory authority of local governments - preemption - disposition of local fines and penalties.

Except as specifically authorized in parts 1, 2, and 3 of this article, no county, town, city, or city and county shall have any authority to regulate the transportation of hazardous materials separate and apart from the regulation of other commodities. However, a county, town, city, or city and county may adopt and enforce regulations or ordinances which are no more stringent than the provisions of state law and regulations adopted pursuant thereto, if violations of such local regulations or ordinances carry penalties which are not more than the penalties imposed upon violations of state law and regulations adopted pursuant thereto. Any local government which adopts a regulation or ordinance pursuant to this section shall file a certified copy of such regulation or ordinance, and any amendment thereto, with the patrol.

No person shall be prosecuted for a violation of both the provisions of part 1, 2, or 3 of this article and the provisions of such local ordinance or regulation when such prosecution arises out of the same incident.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2518, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 43-6-106 as it existed prior to 1994.

42-20-107. Hazardous materials safety fund.

There is hereby created in the state treasury the hazardous materials safety fund, which shall consist of:

Such moneys as may be appropriated thereto by the general assembly from time to time;

Any permit fees collected pursuant to section 42-20-202;

Any penalties collected by a state agency or by a court, as provided in section 42-20-305 (3);

Any penalties collected pursuant to section 42-20-204 (4);

Any gifts or donations made to the state of Colorado or any agency thereof specifically for the purpose of carrying out the provisions of parts 1, 2, and 3 of this article;

Any federal funds made available to the state of Colorado or any agency thereof specifically for the purpose of carrying out the provisions of parts 1, 2, and 3 of this article;

Any excess moneys credited to the fund in accordance with section 40-2-110.5 (9), C.R.S.

The moneys in the hazardous materials safety fund shall be subject to appropriation by the general assembly for the purposes of parts 1, 2, and 3 of this article.

At the end of each fiscal year, any moneys remaining in the hazardous materials safety fund shall not revert to the general fund but shall be subject to appropriation by the general assembly to the executive director of the department of public safety for disbursement to local governments for purposes related to the preparation and training for and response to hazardous materials incidents.

Repealed.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2519, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 2006:

(1)(g) added, p. 1095, § 5, effective August 7.

L. 2014:

(4) added, (HB 14-1081), ch. 8, p. 91, § 3, effective February 27.

L. 2015:

(4) repealed, (SB 15-264), ch. 259, p. 969, § 97, effective August 5.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 43-6-107 as it existed prior to 1994.

42-20-108. Rules and regulations for transportation of hazardous materials.

The chief shall promulgate rules and regulations pursuant to section 24-4-103, C.R.S., for the safe transportation of hazardous materials by motor vehicle, both in interstate and intrastate transportation. Such rules and regulations shall be applicable to any person who transports or ships, or who causes to be transported or shipped, a hazardous material by motor vehicle. Such rules and regulations may govern any safety aspect of the transportation of hazardous materials which the chief deems appropriate, including, but not limited to, the packaging, handling, labeling, marking, and placarding of hazardous materials and motor vehicles transporting hazardous materials, the qualifications of drivers of motor vehicles transporting hazardous materials, financial responsibility requirements, and the use of any package or container in the transportation of hazardous materials which is not manufactured, fabricated, marked, labeled, maintained, reconditioned, repaired, or tested in accordance with such rules and regulations.

The chief shall also promulgate rules and regulations pursuant to section 24-4-103, C.R.S., for the permitting and routing of hazardous materials transportation by motor vehicle within this state and the inspection of vehicles transporting hazardous materials.

In adopting such rules and regulations, the chief shall use as general guidelines the standards and specifications for the safe transportation of hazardous materials contained in federal statutes, and in the rules and regulations promulgated thereunder, as amended from time to time. The rules and regulations adopted by the chief shall not unduly burden interstate or intrastate commerce and shall be no more stringent than federal statutes and the rules and regulations promulgated thereunder.

The rules and regulations adopted by the chief pursuant to subsection (2) of this section shall not apply to farm machinery which is exempted from registration requirements pursuant to section 42-3-103, agricultural distribution equipment attached to or conveyed by such farm machinery, or vehicles used to transport to or from the farm or ranch site products necessary for agricultural production, except when such vehicles are used in the furtherance of any commercial business other than agriculture.

The rules and regulations adopted by the chief shall provide for the issuance of a certificate of inspection which shall exempt inspected vehicles from additional inspections for a period of at least sixty days unless there is probable cause to assume that the vehicle is in an unsafe condition.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2519, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 43-6-108 as it existed prior to 1994.

42-20-108.5. Materials used for agricultural production - exemption - legislative declaration.

The general assembly hereby finds, determines, and declares that the federal government has extended federal hazardous materials rules to agricultural producers in 49 CFR 173.5 in a way that would be unduly burdensome to agriculture without contributing significantly to public safety. The general assembly further finds, determines, and declares that the federal rules give explicit authority to the states to exempt themselves from the federal rules, and that this section is intended to exempt Colorado agriculture from such rules. The general assembly further finds, determines, and declares that it is imperatively necessary for the chief to adopt the rules required by this section in time to meet the deadline imposed by the federal rules.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Agricultural product" means a hazardous material, other than hazardous waste, whose end use directly supports the production of an agricultural commodity including, but not limited to, a fertilizer, pesticide, soil amendment, or fuel. An agricultural product is limited to a material in class 3, 8, or 9, division 2.1, 2.2, 5.1, or 6.1, or an ORM-D material as set forth in 49 CFR parts 172 and 173.

"Farmer" means a person or such person's agent or contractor engaged in the production or raising of crops, poultry, or livestock.

The transportation of an agricultural product other than a class 2 material, as such term is used in 49 CFR parts 172 and 173, over local roads between fields of the same farm, is excepted from the requirements of this part 1 when it is transported by a farmer who is an intrastate private motor carrier and the movement of the agricultural product conforms to rules of the chief, in consultation with the department of agriculture regarding such movement. The chief shall, in consultation with the director of the department of agriculture, promulgate rules and regulations pursuant to section 24-4-103, C.R.S., for the intrastate transportation of agricultural products.

The transportation of an agricultural product to or from a farm, within one hundred fifty miles of such farm, is excepted from the emergency response information and training requirements in subparts G and H of 49 CFR part 172, and this article when:

It is transported by a farmer who is an intrastate private motor carrier;

The total amount of agricultural product being transported on a single vehicle does not exceed:

Seven thousand three hundred kilograms or sixteen thousand ninety-four pounds of ammonium nitrate fertilizer properly classed as division 5.1.PG III in a bulk packaging; or

One thousand nine hundred liters or five hundred two gallons for liquids or gasses, or two thousand three hundred kilograms or five thousand seventy pounds for solids of any other agricultural product;

The packaging conforms to rules adopted by the chief in consultation with the department of agriculture. Such rules shall be adopted by September 30, 1998. Such products are hereby authorized for transportation.

Each person having any responsibility for transporting the agricultural product for shipment pursuant to this subsection (4) is instructed in the applicable requirements of this section.

The rules and regulations adopted by the chief pursuant to this section shall be no more stringent than the federal statutes or regulations require.

Any rules and regulations required to be adopted by the chief pursuant to this section shall be promulgated no later than September 30, 1998. If the chief finds that such rules cannot be promulgated by that date pursuant to the regular rule-making process set forth in section 24-4-103, C.R.S., the chief shall adopt temporary or emergency rules pursuant to section 24-4-103 (6), C.R.S.

The chief shall send a copy of the notification of proposed rule-making for rules adopted pursuant to this section, including temporary or emergency rule-making sent pursuant to section 24-4-103 (3)(b), C.R.S., to the office of legislative legal services.

Source:

L. 98:

Entire section added, p. 722, § 3, effective May 18.

42-20-109. Penalty for violations.

Any person who violates a rule or regulation promulgated by the chief pursuant to section 42-20-104 commits a class 3 misdemeanor and shall be punished as provided in section 18-1.3-501, C.R.S.

Any person who violates a rule promulgated by the chief pursuant to section 42-20-108 commits a class 2 misdemeanor traffic offense and shall be punished as provided in section 42-4-1701.

No conviction pursuant to this section shall bar enforcement by the public utilities commission of any provision of title 40, C.R.S., with respect to violations by persons subject to said title.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2520, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 95:

(3) amended, p. 962, § 25, effective May 25.

L. 2002:

(1) and (2) amended, p. 1564, § 381, effective October 1.

L. 2006:

(2) amended, p. 1064, § 3, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 43-6-109 as it existed prior to 1994.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2002 act amending subsections (1) and (2), see section 1 of chapter 318, Session Laws of Colorado 2002.

42-20-110. Immobilization of unsafe vehicles.

Any enforcement official shall have the power to immobilize, impound, or otherwise direct the disposition of motor vehicles transporting hazardous materials when the enforcement official deems that the motor vehicle or the operation thereof is unsafe and when such immobilization, impoundment, or disposition is appropriate under or required by rules and regulations promulgated by the chief pursuant to section 42-20-104.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2520, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 43-6-110 as it existed prior to 1994.

42-20-111. Additional penalties.

Any person, corporation, partnership, or other entity which intentionally or knowingly authorizes, solicits, requests, commands, conspires in, or aids and abets in the violation of any of the provisions of part 1, 2, or 3 of this article commits a class 1 misdemeanor and shall be punished as provided in section 18-1.3-501, C.R.S.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2521, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 2002:

Entire section amended, p. 1564, § 382, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 43-6-111 as it existed prior to 1994.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2002 act amending this section, see section 1 of chapter 318, Session Laws of Colorado 2002.

42-20-112. Reimbursement of local governments.

A public entity, political subdivision of the state, or other unit of local government is hereby given the right to claim reimbursement for the costs resulting from action taken to remove, contain, or otherwise mitigate the effects of a hazardous materials abandonment or a hazardous materials spill.

Nothing contained in this section shall be construed to change or impair any right of recovery or subrogation arising under any other provision of law.

Claims for reimbursement made pursuant to this section shall be in accordance with article 22 of title 29, C.R.S.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2521, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 43-6-112 as it existed prior to 1994.

42-20-113. Hazardous materials spill - abandonment of vehicle containing hazardous material - penalty.

No person shall abandon any vehicle containing any hazardous material excluding that which is considered fuel and is contained within the vehicle's fuel tank or shall intentionally spill hazardous materials upon a street, highway, right-of-way, or any other public property or upon any private property without the express consent of the owner or person in lawful charge of that private property.

As used in this section, "abandon" means to leave a thing with the intention not to retain possession of or assert ownership or control over it. The intent need not coincide with the act of leaving.

It is prima facie evidence of the necessary intent that:

The vehicle has been left for more than three days unattended and unmoved; or

License plates or other identifying marks have been removed from the vehicle; or

The vehicle has been damaged or is deteriorated so extensively that it has value only for junk or salvage; or

The owner has been notified by a law enforcement agency to remove the vehicle and it has not been removed within twenty-four hours after notification.

The driver of a motor vehicle transporting hazardous materials as cargo which is involved in a hazardous materials spill, whether intentional or unintentional, shall give immediate notice of the location of such spill and such other information as necessary to the nearest law enforcement agency.

Any person who violates the provisions of subsection (3) of this section commits a class 3 misdemeanor and shall be punished as provided in section 18-1.3-501, C.R.S.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2521, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 2002:

(4) amended, p. 1565, § 383, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 43-6-113 as it existed prior to 1994.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2002 act amending subsection (4), see section 1 of chapter 318, Session Laws of Colorado 2002.